Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20266-124
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Assignment for Benefit of Creditors Act, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the law among states that enact it.

Laws 2026, LB783, § 24.
July 18, 2026